Washington statutes.
RCW 36.39.040

Federal surplus commodities—County expenses—Handling commodities for certified persons—County program, cooperative program.

The county commissioners of any county may expend from the county general fund for the purpose of receiving, warehousing and distributing federal surplus commodities for the use of or assistance to recipients of public assistance or other needy families and individuals when such recipients, families or individuals are certified as eligible to obtain such commodities by the state department of social and health services. The county commissioners may expend county general fund moneys to carry out any such program as a sole county operation or in conjunction or cooperation with any similar program of distribution by private individuals or organizations, any department of the state, or any political subdivision of the state.

[ 1979 c 141 s 43; 1963 c 4 s 36.39.040. Prior: 1957 c 187 s 5.]